Massachusetts, session 194th, S2400.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (c) of section 30 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is herby amended by inserting after clause 11 the following new clause:-
“; and (12) fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect tolls for transit over
the following roadways: interstate Route 90 at the Commonwealth’s border with New York,
interstate Route 84 at the Commonwealth’s border with Connecticut, interstate Route 93 at the
Commonwealth’s border with New Hampshire; interstate Route 95 at the Commonwealth’s
borders with New Hampshire and Rhode Island; interstate Route 91 at the Commonwealth’s
borders with Connecticut and Vermont, interstate Route 395 at the Commonwealth’s border with
Connecticut; interstate Route 295 at the Commonwealth’s border with Rhode Island; Route, 24
at the Commonwealth’s border with Rhode Island; Route 3, at the Commonwealth’s border with
New Hampshire, Route 7 at the Commonwealth’s borders with Connecticut and Vermont and
Route 146 at the Commonwealth’s border with Rhode Island.”
of 1